test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_spaalvas_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - spáálváš:  
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Nom: spáálváš
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Gen: spálváá
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Acc: spálváá
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Ill: [spáˊlvážân, spáálvážân, spálváážân]
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Loc: spálváást
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Com: spálváin
    spáálváš+N+Sg+Abe: spálvááttáá
    spáálváš+N+Ess: [spáˊlvážin, spáálvážin, spálváážin]
    spáálváš+N+Par: [spáˊlvážid, spáálvážid, spálváážin]
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Nom: spálvááh
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Gen: spálvái
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Acc: spálváid
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Ill: spálváid
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Loc: spálváin
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Com: spálváiguin
    spáálváš+N+Pl+Abe: spálváittáá

  Noun - váávláš: # MLO, ok
    váávláš+N+Sg+Nom: váávláš
    váávláš+N+Sg+Gen: vávláá
    váávláš+N+Sg+Acc: vávláá
    váávláš+N+Sg+Ill: váávlážân
    váávláš+N+Sg+Loc: vávláást
    váávláš+N+Sg+Com: vávláin
    váávláš+N+Sg+Abe: vávlááttáá
    váávláš+N+Ess: váávlážin
    váávláš+N+Par: váávlážid
    váávláš+N+Pl+Nom: vávlááh
    váávláš+N+Pl+Gen: vávlái
    váávláš+N+Pl+Acc: vávláid
    váávláš+N+Pl+Ill: vávláid
    váávláš+N+Pl+Loc: vávláin
    váávláš+N+Pl+Com: vávláiguin
    váávláš+N+Pl+Abe: vávláittáá
